District of Columbia statutes.
11-1911

Length of service.

The length of service for grand and petit jurors shall be determined by the master jury plan. In any twenty-four month period an individual shall not be required to serve more than once as a grand or petit juror except as may be necessary by reason of the insufficiency of the master juror list or as ordered by the Court.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 515, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
Nov. 14, 1986, 100 Stat. 3635, Pub. L. 99-650, § 2
1981 Ed., § 11-1911.
1973 Ed., § 11-1905.
Short title: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 11-1901.